Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-206
Pawned or secondhand goods; restrictions
on disposition; jewelry defined.

No personal property received
or purchased by any pawnbroker, dealer in secondhand goods, or junk dealer,
shall be sold or permitted to be taken from the place of business of such
person for fourteen days after the copy
of the card or ledger entry required to be delivered to the police department
or sheriff's office shall have been delivered as required by section 69-205.
Secondhand jewelry shall not be destroyed, damaged, or in any manner defaced
for a period of fourteen
days after the time of its purchase or receipt. For purposes of
this section, jewelry shall mean any ornament which is intended to be worn
on or about the body and which is made in whole or in part of any precious
metal, including gold, silver, platinum, copper, brass, or pewter.

All property accepted as collateral security or purchased by a pawnbroker
shall be kept segregated from all other property in a separate area for a
period of forty-eight hours after its receipt or purchase, except that valuable
articles may be kept in a safe with other property if grouped according to
the day of purchase or receipt. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section,
a pawnbroker may return any property to the person pawning the same after
the expiration of such forty-eight-hour period or when permitted by the chief
of police, sheriff, or other authorized law enforcement officer.

Laws 1899, c. 10, § 6, p. 66;

R.S.1913, § 541;

C.S.1922, § 433;

C.S.1929, § 69-206;

R.S.1943, § 69-206;

Laws 1981, LB 44, § 6;

Laws 2012, LB941, § 1.